Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska47-701
Medical services, defined; responsibility for payment.

(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and except as provided in section 44-713, sections 47-701 to 47-705 shall govern responsibility for payment of the costs of medical services for any person ill, wounded, injured, or otherwise in need of such services at the time such person is arrested, detained, taken into custody, or incarcerated.

(2) For purposes of sections 47-701 to 47-705, the term medical services includes medical and surgical care and treatment, hospitalization, transportation, medications and prescriptions, and other associated items.

Laws 1999, LB 112, § 1;

Laws 2018, LB480, § 2.